Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.615

Conversion of domestic corporation to limited cooperative association—Procedure.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a domestic corporation organized under this chapter, and taking the election provided in RCW 24.06.032(1), may convert to a limited cooperative association pursuant to RCW 23.100.1302 through 23.100.1314.

(2) This section does not apply to a domestic corporation organized for the purpose of generating, purchasing, selling, marketing, transmitting, or distributing electric energy.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1405.]

NOTES:

Uniformity of application and construction—Savings—2019 c 37: See RCW 23.100.1501 and 23.100.1503.